Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2612.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 6 TLSB 6093YH (2) 91 mb/jh H.F. 2612 Section 1. Section 256E.7, subsection 2, Code 2026, is 1 amended by adding the following new paragraph: 2 NEW PARAGRAPH . 0w. Be subject to and comply with the 3 requirements of section 299.1, subsection 3A, relating to the 4 adoption of a policy requiring excused absences for student 5 participation in a civic or political event in the same manner 6 as a school district. 7 Sec. 2. Section 256F.4, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 8 by adding the following new paragraph: 9 NEW PARAGRAPH . v. Be subject to and comply with the 10 requirements of section 299.1, subsection 3A, relating to the 11 adoption of a policy requiring excused absences for student 12 participation in a civic or political event in the same manner 13 as a school district. 14 Sec. 3. Section 299.1, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 15 following new subsection: 16 NEW SUBSECTION . 3A. a. The board of directors of 17 each public school district and the governing body of each 18 accredited nonpublic school shall adopt a policy that requires 19 the school district or accredited nonpublic school to grant a 20 student who is enrolled in grades six through twelve at least 21 one excused absence each school year when the student is absent 22 from school because of the studentâs participation in a civic 23 or political event. The policy shall require that the board 24 of directors of the school district or the governing body of 25 the accredited nonpublic school shall not grant the student an 26 excused absence to participate in the civic or political event 27 unless the student gives notice of the studentâs intent to 28 participate in the civic or political event to an administrator 29 employed by the board of directors of the school district or 30 the governing body of the accredited nonpublic school at least 31 twenty-four hours in advance of the civic or political event. 32 b. For purposes of this subsection, âcivic or political 33 eventâ includes all of the following: 34 (1) Voting in an election. 35 -1- LSB 6093YH (2) 91 mb/jh 1/ 3 H.F. 2612 (2) Serving as a poll worker. 1 (3) Participating in a strike. 2 (4) Attending a meeting of a federal, state, or local 3 governmental body. 4 (5) Attending a political rally. 5 (6) Attending a political forum. 6 (7) Attending a civic forum. 7 (8) Attending a town hall meeting. 8 Sec. 4. Section 299.1, subsection 4, paragraph b, Code 2026, 9 is amended by adding the following new subparagraph: 10 NEW SUBPARAGRAPH . (12) While participating in a civic 11 or political event in accordance with a policy adopted under 12 subsection 3A. 13 Sec. 5. Section 299.12, subsection 1, paragraph a, Code 14 2026, is amended to read as follows: 15 a. âChronically absentâ means any absence from school for 16 more than ten percent of the days or hours in the grading 17 period established by a public school; provided, however, 18 that an absence from school that is related to attending a 19 course in religious instruction pursuant to section 299.1D 20 or that is related to participation in a civic or political 21 event in accordance with a policy adopted under section 299.1, 22 subsection 3A, shall not count toward this amount. 23